Nebraska, session 109, LB334.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB334 LB334
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-607, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-607 (1)(a) All candidate filing forms shall contain the following
statement: I hereby swear that I will abide by the laws of the State of
Nebraska regarding the results of the primary and general elections, that
I am a registered voter and qualified to be elected, and that I will
serve if elected. Candidate filing forms shall also contain the following
information regarding the candidate: Name, as provided under subdivision
(b) of this subsection; residence address; mailing address if different
from the residence address; telephone number; office sought; party
affiliation if the office sought is a partisan office; a statement as to
whether or not civil penalties are owed pursuant to the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act; and, if civil penalties are
owed, whether or not a surety bond has been filed pursuant to subdivision
(4)(b) of section 32-602. An email address shall also be included on the
filing form as an optional field.
(b) The name contained on a candidate filing form shall be the name
by which the candidate is generally known in the community and by which
the candidate is distinguished from others and shall not contain titles,
characterizations, or designations.
(2) Candidate filing forms shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(a) For candidates for national, state, or congressional office,
directors of public power and irrigation districts, directors of
reclamation districts, directors of natural resources districts,
directors of metropolitan utilities districts, members of the boards of
educational service units, members of governing boards of community
colleges, delegates to national conventions, and other offices filled by
election held in more than one county and judges desiring retention, in
the office of the Secretary of State;
(b) For officers elected within a county, in the office of the
-2-

LB334 LB334
2025 2025
election commissioner or county clerk;
(c) For officers in school districts which include land in adjoining
counties, in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk of
the county in which the greatest number of registered voters entitled to
vote for the officers reside; and
(d) For city or village officers, in the office of the election
commissioner or county clerk.
(3) Objections to the name of a candidate submitted on a candidate
filing form may be made and passed upon in the same manner as objections
to a candidate filing form pursuant to section 32-624.
(4) The residence address, mailing address, and telephone number
contained in the candidate filing form for judges desiring retention
shall be kept confidential by the filing officer.
Sec. 2. Original section 32-607, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-